Oklahoma, session 2025, SB716.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 11 O.S. 2021, Section 50-110, as


last amended by Section 4, Chapter 357, O.S.L. 2024 (11 O.S. Supp.


2024, Section 50-110), is amended to read as follows:


Section 50-110. A. Each member in the Oklahoma Police Pension


and Retirement System prior to the effective date of this act July


1, 2025, shall contribute to the System a minimum of eight percent


(8%) of the member’s actual paid base salary. On or after the


effective date of this act, each member shall contribute to the


System a minimum of nine percent (9%) On and after July 1, 2025,


each member shall contribute to the System a minimum of eleven


percent (11%).

Req. No. 1180 Page 1

RBS No. 1180

At the option of the participating municipality, the


participating municipality may pay all or any part of the member’s


required contribution. The sums contributed shall be paid online to


the System as provided in this article within ten (10) days


following the payroll period on which the contributions are based.


Amounts deducted from the salary of a member and not paid to the


System after thirty (30) days from each ending payroll date shall be


subject to a monthly late charge of five percent (5%) of the unpaid


balance to be paid by the municipality to the System. All funds


received by a participating municipality for police retirement


purposes shall be forwarded to the Oklahoma Police Pension and


Retirement Board for credit to the Oklahoma Police Pension and


Retirement Fund.


B. Each municipality shall pick up under the provisions of


Section 414(h)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,


and pay the contribution which the member is required by law to make


to the System for all compensation earned after December 31, 1988.


Although the contributions so picked up are designated as member


contributions, such contributions shall be treated as contributions


being paid by the municipality in lieu of contributions by the


member in determining tax treatment under the Internal Revenue Code


of 1986, as amended, and such picked-up contributions shall not be


includable in the gross income of the member until such amounts are


distributed or made available to the member or the beneficiary of

Req. No. 1180 Page 2

RBS No. 1180

the member. The member, by the terms of this System, shall not have


any option to choose to receive the contributions so picked up


directly and the picked-up contributions must be paid by the


municipality to the System.


Member contributions which are picked up shall be treated in the


same manner and to the same extent as member contributions made


prior to the date on which member contributions were picked up by


the municipality. Member contributions so picked up shall be


included in gross salary for purposes of determining benefits and


contributions under the System.


The municipality shall pay the member contributions from the


same source of funds used in paying salary to the member, by


effecting an equal cash reduction in gross salary of the member.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1180 RD 1/19/2025 5:41:54 AM









Req. No. 1180 Page 3